New Jersey, session 222, A4230.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 5 of P.L.1945, c.169 (C.10:5-5) is amended to read as follows: 5.    As used in P.L.1945, c.169 (C.10:5-1 et seq.), unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context: a.     "Person" includes one or more individuals, partnerships, associations, organizations, labor organizations, corporations, legal representatives, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy, receivers, and fiduciaries. b.    "Employment agency" includes any person undertaking to procure employees or opportunities for others to work. c.     "Labor organization" includes any organization which exists and is constituted for the purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining, or of dealing with employers concerning grievances, terms or conditions of employment, or of other mutual aid or protection in connection with employment. d.    "Unlawful employment practice" and "unlawful discrimination" include only those unlawful practices and acts specified in section 11 of P.L.1945, c.169 (C.10:5-12). e.     "Employer" includes all persons as defined in subsection a. of this section and "hiring entities" as defined by section 2 of P.L.2023, c.262 (C.34:11-70), unless otherwise specifically exempt under another section of P.L.1945, c.169 (C.10:5-1 et seq.), and includes the State, any political or civil subdivision thereof, and all public officers, agencies, boards, or bodies. f.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2023, c.262) g.    "Liability for service in the Armed Forces of the United States" means subject to being ordered as an individual or member of an organized unit into active service in the Armed Forces of the United States by reason of membership in the National Guard, naval militia or a reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States, or subject to being inducted into such armed forces through a system of national selective service. h.    "Division" means the "Division on Civil Rights" created by P.L.1945, c.169 (C.10:5-1 et seq.). i.     "Attorney General" means the Attorney General of the State of New Jersey or the Attorney General's representative or designee. j.     "Commission" means the Commission on Civil Rights created by P.L.1945, c.169 (C.10:5-1 et seq.). k.    "Director" means the Director of the Division on Civil Rights. l.     "A place of public accommodation" shall include, but not be limited to:  any tavern, roadhouse, hotel, motel, trailer camp, summer camp, day camp, or resort camp, whether for entertainment of transient guests or accommodation of those seeking health, recreation, or rest; any producer, manufacturer, wholesaler, distributor, retail shop, store, establishment, or concession dealing with goods or services of any kind; any restaurant, eating house, or place where food is sold for consumption on the premises; any place maintained for the sale of ice cream, ice and fruit preparations or their derivatives, soda water or confections, or where any beverages of any kind are retailed for consumption on the premises; any garage, any public conveyance operated on land or water or in the air or any stations and terminals thereof; any bathhouse, boardwalk, or seashore accommodation; any auditorium, meeting place, or hall; any theatre, movie theater, motion-picture house, music hall, roof garden, skating rink, swimming pool, amusement and recreation park, fair, bowling alley, gymnasium, shooting gallery, billiard and pool parlor, or other place of amusement; any comfort station; any dispensary, clinic, or hospital; any public library; and any kindergarten, primary and secondary school, trade or business school, high school, academy, college and university, or any educational institution under the supervision of the State Board of Education or the Commissioner of Education of the State of New Jersey.  Nothing herein contained shall be construed to include or to apply to any institution, bona fide club, or place of accommodation, which is in its nature distinctly private; nor shall anything herein contained apply to any educational facility operated or maintained by a bona fide religious or sectarian institution, and the right of a natural parent or one in loco parentis to direct the education and upbringing of a child under his control is hereby affirmed; nor shall anything herein contained be construed to bar any private secondary or post-secondary school from using in good faith criteria other than race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, gender identity, or expression or affectional or sexual orientation in the admission of students. m.   "A publicly assisted housing accommodation" shall include all housing built with public funds or public assistance pursuant to P.L.1949, c.300, P.L.1941, c.213, P.L.1944, c.169, P.L.1949, c.303, P.L.1938, c.19, P.L.1938, c.20, P.L.1946, c.52, and P.L.1949, c.184, and all housing financed in whole or in part by a loan, whether or not secured by a mortgage, the repayment of which is guaranteed or insured by the federal government or any agency thereof. n.    The term "real property" includes real estate, lands, tenements and hereditaments, corporeal and incorporeal, and leaseholds, provided, however, that, except as to publicly assisted housing accommodations, the provisions of this act shall not apply to the rental:  (1) of a single apartment or flat in a two-family dwelling, the other occupancy unit of which is occupied by the owner as a residence; or (2) of a room or rooms to another person or persons by the owner or occupant of a one-family dwelling occupied by the owner or occupant as a residence at the time of such rental.  Nothing herein contained shall be construed to bar any religious or denominational institution or organization, or any organization operated for charitable or educational purposes, which is operated, supervised, or controlled by or in connection with a religious organization, in the sale, lease, or rental of real property, from limiting admission to or giving preference to persons of the same religion or denomination or from making such selection as is calculated by such organization to promote the religious principles for which it is established or maintained.  Nor does any provision under this act regarding discrimination on the basis of familial status apply with respect to housing for older persons. o.    "Real estate broker" includes a person, firm, or corporation who, for a fee, commission, or other valuable consideration, or by reason of promise or reasonable expectation thereof, lists for sale, sells, exchanges, buys or rents, or offers or attempts to negotiate a sale, exchange, purchase, or rental of real estate or an interest therein, or collects or offers or attempts to collect rent for the use of real estate, or solicits for prospective purchasers or assists or directs in the procuring of prospects or the negotiation or closing of any transaction which does or is contemplated to result in the sale, exchange, leasing, renting, or auctioning of any real estate, or negotiates, or offers or attempts or agrees to negotiate a loan secured or to be secured by mortgage or other encumbrance upon or transfer of any real estate for others; or any person who, for pecuniary gain or expectation of pecuniary gain conducts a public or private competitive sale of lands or any interest in lands.  In the sale of lots, the term "real estate broker" shall also include any person, partnership, association, or corporation employed by or on behalf of the owner or owners of lots or other parcels of real estate, at a stated salary, or upon a commission, or upon a salary and commission or otherwise, to sell such real estate, or any parts thereof, in lots or other parcels, and who shall sell or exchange, or offer or attempt or agree to negotiate the sale or exchange, of any such lot or parcel of real estate. p.    "Real estate salesperson" includes any person who, for compensation, valuable consideration or commission, or other thing of value, or by reason of a promise or reasonable expectation thereof, is employed by and operates under the supervision of a licensed real estate broker to sell or offer to sell, buy or offer to buy or negotiate the purchase, sale, or exchange of real estate, or offers or attempts to negotiate a loan secured or to be secured by a mortgage or other encumbrance upon or transfer of real estate, or to lease or rent, or offer to lease or rent any real estate for others, or to collect rents for the use of real estate, or to solicit for prospective purchasers or lessees of real estate, or who is employed by a licensed real estate broker to sell or offer to sell lots or other parcels of real estate, at a stated salary, or upon a commission, or upon a salary and commission, or otherwise to sell real estate, or any parts thereof, in lots or other parcels. q.    "Disability" means physical or sensory disability, infirmity, malformation, or disfigurement which is caused by bodily injury, birth defect, or illness including epilepsy and other seizure disorders, and which shall include, but not be limited to, any degree of paralysis, amputation, lack of physical coordination, blindness or visual impairment, deafness or hearing impairment, muteness or speech impairment, or physical reliance on a service or guide dog, wheelchair, or other remedial appliance or device, or any mental, psychological, or developmental disability, including autism spectrum disorders, resulting from anatomical, psychological, physiological, or neurological conditions which prevents the typical exercise of any bodily or mental functions or is demonstrable, medically or psychologically, by accepted clinical or laboratory diagnostic techniques.  Disability shall also mean AIDS or HIV infection. r.     "Blind person" or "person who is blind" means any individual whose central visual acuity does not exceed 20/200 in the better eye with correcting lens or whose visual acuity is better than 20/200 if accompanied by a limit to the field of vision in the better eye to such a degree that its widest diameter subtends an angle of no greater than 20 degrees. s.     "Guide dog" means a dog used to assist persons who are deaf, or which is fitted with a special harness so as to be suitable as an aid to the mobility of a person who is blind, and is used by a person who is blind and has satisfactorily completed a specific course of training in the use of such a dog, and has been trained by an organization generally recognized by agencies involved in the rehabilitation of persons with disabilities, including, but not limited to, those persons who are blind or deaf, as reputable and competent to provide dogs with training of this type. t.     "Guide or service dog trainer" means any person who is employed by an organization generally recognized by agencies involved in the rehabilitation of persons with disabilities, including, but not limited to, those persons who are blind, have visual impairments, or are deaf or have hearing impairments, as reputable and competent to provide dogs with training, as defined in this section, and who is actually involved in the training process. u.    "Housing accommodation" means any publicly assisted housing accommodation or any real property, or portion thereof, which is used or occupied, or is intended, arranged, or designed to be used or occupied, as the home, residence, or sleeping place of one or more persons, but shall not include any single family residence the occupants of which rent, lease, or furnish for compensation not more than one room therein. v.    "Public facility" means any place of public accommodation and any street, highway, sidewalk, walkway, public building, and any other place or structure to which the general public is regularly, normally, or customarily permitted or invited. w.   "Deaf person" or "person who is deaf" means any person whose hearing is so severely impaired that the person is unable to hear and understand conversational speech through the unaided ear alone, and who must depend primarily on an assistive listening device or visual communication such as writing, lip reading, sign language, and gestures. x.    "Atypical hereditary cellular or blood trait" means sickle cell trait, hemoglobin C trait, thalassemia trait, Tay-Sachs trait, or cystic fibrosis trait. y.    "Sickle cell trait" means the condition wherein the major natural hemoglobin components present in the blood of the individual are hemoglobin A (normal) and hemoglobin S (sickle hemoglobin) as defined by standard chemical and physical analytic techniques, including electrophoresis; and the proportion of hemoglobin A is greater than the proportion of hemoglobin S or one natural parent of the individual is shown to have only normal hemoglobin components (hemoglobin A, hemoglobin A2, hemoglobin F) in the normal proportions by standard chemical and physical analytic tests. z.     "Hemoglobin C trait" means the condition wherein the major natural hemoglobin components present in the blood of the individual are hemoglobin A (normal) and hemoglobin C as defined by standard chemical and physical analytic techniques, including electrophoresis; and the proportion of hemoglobin A is greater than the proportion of hemoglobin C or one natural parent of the individual is shown to have only normal hemoglobin components (hemoglobin A, hemoglobin A2, hemoglobin F) in normal proportions by standard chemical and physical analytic tests. aa.   "Thalassemia trait" means the presence of the thalassemia gene which in combination with another similar gene results in the chronic hereditary disease Cooley's anemia. bb.  "Tay-Sachs trait" means the presence of the Tay-Sachs gene which in combination with another similar gene results in the chronic hereditary disease Tay-Sachs. cc.   "Cystic fibrosis trait" means the presence of the cystic fibrosis gene which in combination with another similar gene results in the chronic hereditary disease cystic fibrosis. dd.  "Service dog" means any dog individually trained to the requirements of a person with a disability including, but not limited to minimal protection work, rescue work, pulling a wheelchair or retrieving dropped items.  This term shall include a "seizure dog" trained to alert or otherwise assist persons with epilepsy or other seizure disorders. ee.   "Qualified Medicaid applicant" means an individual who is a qualified applicant pursuant to P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.). ff.   "AIDS" means acquired immune deficiency syndrome as defined by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention of the United States Public Health Service. gg.  "HIV infection" means infection with the human immunodeficiency virus or any other related virus identified as a probable causative agent of AIDS. hh.  "Affectional or sexual orientation" means male or female heterosexuality, homosexuality, or bisexuality by inclination, practice, identity, or expression, having a history thereof or being perceived, presumed, or identified by others as having such an orientation. ii.    "Heterosexuality" means affectional, emotional, or physical attraction or behavior which is primarily directed towards persons of the other gender. jj.    "Homosexuality" means affectional, emotional, or physical attraction or behavior which is primarily directed towards persons of the same gender. kk.  "Bisexuality" means affectional, emotional, or physical attraction or behavior which is directed towards persons of multiple genders. ll.    "Familial status" means being the natural parent of a child, the adoptive parent of a child, the resource family parent of a child, having a "parent and child relationship" with a child as defined by State law, or having sole or joint legal or physical custody, care, guardianship, or visitation with a child, or any person who is pregnant or is in the process of securing legal custody of any individual who has not attained the age of 18 years. mm.  "Housing for older persons" means housing: (1)   provided under any State program that the Attorney General determines is specifically designed and operated to assist persons who are elderly (as defined in the State program); or provided under any federal program that the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development determines is specifically designed and operated to assist persons who are elderly (as defined in the federal program); or (2)   intended for, and solely occupied by, persons 62 years of age or older; or (3)   intended and operated for occupancy by at least one person 55 years of age or older per unit.  In determining whether housing qualifies as housing for older persons under this paragraph, the Attorney General shall adopt regulations which require at least the following factors: (a)   the existence of significant facilities and services specifically designed to meet the physical or social needs of older persons, or if the provision of such facilities and services is not practicable, that such housing is necessary to provide important housing opportunities for older persons; and (b)   that at least 80 percent of the units are occupied by at least one person 55 years of age or older per unit; and (c)   the publication of, and adherence to, policies and procedures which demonstrate an intent by the owner or manager to provide housing for persons 55 years of age or older. Housing shall not fail to meet the requirements for housing for older persons by reason of:  persons residing in such housing as of September 13, 1988 not meeting the age requirements of this subsection, provided that new occupants of such housing meet the age requirements of this subsection; or unoccupied units, provided that such units are reserved for occupancy by persons who meet the age requirements of this subsection. nn.  "Genetic characteristic" means any inherited gene or chromosome, or alteration thereof, that is scientifically or medically believed to predispose an individual to a disease, disorder, or syndrome, or to be associated with a statistically significant increased risk of development of a disease, disorder, or syndrome. oo.  "Genetic information" means the information about genes, gene products, or inherited characteristics that may derive from an individual or family member. pp.  "Genetic test" means a test for determining the presence or absence of an inherited genetic characteristic in an individual, including tests of nucleic acids such as DNA, RNA, and mitochondrial DNA, chromosomes, or proteins in order to identify a predisposing genetic characteristic. qq.  "Domestic partnership" means a domestic partnership established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2003, c.246 (C.26:8A-4). rr.    "Gender identity or expression" means having or being perceived as having a gender related identity or expression whether or not stereotypically associated with a person's assigned sex at birth. ss.   "Civil Union" means a legally recognized union of two eligible individuals established pursuant to R.S.37:1-1 et seq. and P.L.2006, c.103 (C.37:1-28 et al.). tt.    "Premium pay" means additional remuneration for night, weekend, or holiday work, or for standby or irregular duty. uu.  "Premium benefit" means an employment benefit, such as seniority, group life insurance, health insurance, disability insurance, sick leave, annual leave, or an educational or pension benefit that is greater than the employment benefit due the employee for an equivalent period of work performed during the regular work schedule of the employee. vv.  "Race" is inclusive of traits historically associated with race, including, but not limited to, hair texture, hair types, and protective hairstyles. ww. "Protective hairstyles" includes, but is not limited to, such hairstyles as braids, locks, and twists. xx.  "Family member" means a child, parent, parent-in-law, sibling, grandparent, grandchild, spouse, partner in a civil union couple, domestic partner, or any other individual related by blood to the person, and any other individual that the person shows to have a close association with the person which is the equivalent of a family relationship. yy. "Audio description" means the spoken narration of a movies key visual elements, such as the action, settings, facial expressions, costumes, and scene changes and generally requires the use of an audio description device for delivery to the patron. zz. "Audio description device" means the individual device that a patron may use at any seat of a movie theater to hear audio description. aaa.  "Captioning device" means the individual device that a patron may use at any seat of a movie theater to view closed movie captioning. bbb.  "Closed movie captioning" means the written display of a movies dialogue and non-speech information, such as music, the identity of the character who is speaking, and other sounds or sound effects and generally requires the use of a captioning device for delivery of the captions to the patron. ccc.  "Open movie captioning" means the written on-screen display of a movies dialogue and non-speech information, such as music, the identity of the character who is speaking, and other sounds and sound effects. (cf: P.L. 2023, c.262, s.3) 2.    (New section)  a.  Any public facility that owns, leases, or operates a movie theater shall: (1)   have and maintain the equipment necessary to provide closed movie captioning and audio description at a movie patrons seat whenever showing a digital movie produced, distributed, or otherwise made available by the creators of the digital movie to include these features; (2)   provide notice to the public about the availability of closed movie captioning and audio description devices that are available for use at a movie patrons seat; (3)   ensure that theater staff is available to assist movie patrons with the equipment before, during, and after the showing of a movie with these features; and (4)   distribute audio description and movie captioning devices at no additional fee to movie patrons. b.    For both closed movie captioning and audio description, movie theaters shall obtain and install the necessary equipment that enables movie patrons to view the closed movie captions and hear the audio description from their individual seats. c.     The number of operational captioning devices and audio description devices a movie theater shall have available is dependent upon the number of auditoriums showing digital movies.  The specific requirements are as follows: (1)   a movie theater with one auditorium showing digital movies shall provide a minimum of four captioning devices and a minimum of two audio description devices; (2)   a movie theater with at least two but no more than seven auditoriums showing digital movies shall provide a minimum of six captioning devices and a minimum of three audio description devices; (3)   a movie theater with at least eight but no more than 15 auditoriums showing digital movies shall provide a minimum of eight captioning devices and a minimum of six audio description devices; and (4)   a movie theater with 16 or more auditoriums showing digital movies shall provide a minimum of 12 captioning devices and a minimum of nine audio description devices. d.    The requirements set forth in this section for movie theaters to provide auxiliary aids and services for individuals with a visual or hearing impairment shall not apply to movie theaters that show only analog movies in all of its auditoriums or any drive-in movie theaters. e.     The provisions of this section shall not be construed to require movie theaters to: (1)   use digital projection technology or provide open movie captioning to satisfy the requirements set forth in this section; (2)   add closed movie captioning or audio description to a movie that is not produced, distributed, or otherwise made available by the creators of the digital movie to include these features; or (3)   prevent the showing of a particular digital movie that is not produced or otherwise made available with closed movie captioning or audio description capability. f.     Any movie theater that violates the requirements of this section shall be subject to any penalties established pursuant to P.L.1945, c.169 (C.10:5-1 et seq.) or any other law. 3.    This act shall take effect 90 days after enactment.